Utah statutes.
13-10-4.   Prohibited practices.

It is unlawful for any individual, partnership, corporation, or association:

(1)  to knowingly transfer or cause to be transferred, directly or indirectly, for sale or profit within this state, without the express consent of the owner, by any means, any sounds recorded on a phonographic record, disc, wire, tape, film, or other article or material on which sounds are recorded onto any other phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, article, or material;

(2)  to sell, distribute, circulate, or offer for sale, distribution or circulation, or cause to be sold, distributed, circulated, or possess for the purpose of sale, distribution, or circulation, within the state, for a consideration, any phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, or other article or material onto which such sounds have been transferred, with the knowledge that the sounds thereon have been transferred without the express consent of the owner; or

(3)  to knowingly rent, make available, or permit the use of, or offer to rent, make available, or permit the use of, for a fee, rental, or any other form of compensation, any equipment or machinery for the purpose of enabling, aiding, or causing another to transfer without the consent of the owner any sounds recorded on a phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, or other article or material onto any other phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, article, or material.

